Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Chapter 3 Investment of Trust Funds
35-3-116. Courts empowered to authorize retention of original investments.

Any guardian, personal representative, trustee or other fiduciary may make, in the county in which appointed, application to the chancery court, or to any other court therein having concurrent jurisdiction, for permission to retain and hold in unchanged form any security or investment originally forming a part of the estate, and the court shall have the authority and power to authorize the guardian, personal representative, trustee or other fiduciary, to retain and hold in unchanged form any security or investment originally forming a part of the estate, upon it being made to appear to the court that retention of the security or investment is to the manifest interest of the estate. The authority to retain securities or investments, when granted to the fiduciary by the instrument under which the fiduciary is acting, is not affected by the foregoing provisions.

The application in every such case shall be made by bill or petition, and the beneficiaries be made the defendants and served with process, and the cause shall be conducted and heard in the same manner as other suits in chancery.

A guardian ad litem shall be appointed for all defendants under disability, and the decree of the court authorizing the retention of the securities or investments shall set out fully the reasons and object moving the court in granting to the fiduciary the authority so to do.

It is not intended to impose upon a fiduciary any duty or obligation in addition to those arising under previously existing law, nor is it intended to change, modify or alter any investment statute of the state, except insofar as variations from those statutes may be made through proceedings authorized by this section.

Acts 1945, ch. 53, §§ 1-4; mod. C. Supp. 1950, §§ 9596.5-9596.7 (Williams, §§ 9596.9-9596.11); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-316 — 35-318.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 740.

Law Reviews.

Wills and Fiduciary Powers (Robert L. McMurray), 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1964).

Collateral References.

Absences of market therefor as justifying trustee's retention of unauthorized or nonlegal securities received from creator of trust. 88 A.L.R.3d 894.

35-3-117. Investment in securities of management investment company or investment trust by bank or trust company — Fiduciary liability — Abuse of fiduciary discretion.

Notwithstanding any other law, a bank or trust company, to the extent it acts at the direction of another person authorized to direct investment of funds held by the bank or trust company, or to the extent that it exercises investment discretion as a fiduciary, custodian, managing agent, or otherwise with respect to the investment and reinvestment of assets that it maintains in its trust department, may invest and reinvest the assets, subject to the standard contained in this section, in the securities of any open-end or closed-end management investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. §§ 80a-1 — 80a-64). The fact that the bank or trust company, or any affiliate of the bank or trust company, is providing services to the investment company or trust as investment advisor, sponsor, distributor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar or otherwise, and receiving reasonable remuneration for the services, does not preclude the bank or trust company from investing in the securities of the investment company or trust.

In the absence of express provisions to the contrary in the governing instrument, a fiduciary will not be liable to the beneficiaries or to the trust with respect to a decision regarding the allocation and nature of investments of trust assets unless the court determines that the decision was an abuse of the fiduciary's discretion. A court shall not determine that a fiduciary abused its discretion merely because the court would not have exercised the discretion in the same manner.

If a court determines that a fiduciary has abused its discretion regarding the allocation and nature of investments of trust assets, the remedy is to restore the income and remainder beneficiaries to the positions they would have occupied if the fiduciary had not abused its discretion, according to the following rules:

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in no distribution to a beneficiary or a distribution that is too small, the court shall require a distribution from the trust to the beneficiary in an amount that the court determines will restore the beneficiary, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary's appropriate position, taking into account all prior distributions to the beneficiary.

To the extent that the abuse of discretion has resulted in a distribution to a beneficiary that is too large, the court shall restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, in whole or in part, to their appropriate positions, taking into account all prior distributions, by requiring the fiduciary to withhold an amount from one (1) or more future distributions to the beneficiary who received the distribution that was too large or requiring that beneficiary to return some or all of the distribution to the trust.

To the extent that the court is unable, after applying subdivisions (c)(1) and (c)(2), to restore the beneficiaries, the trust, or both, to the position they would have occupied if the fiduciary had not abused its discretion, the court may require the fiduciary to pay an appropriate amount from its own funds to one (1) or more of the beneficiaries or the trust or both.

Upon a petition by the fiduciary, the court having jurisdiction over the trust or agency account shall determine whether a proposed plan of investment by the fiduciary will result in an abuse of the fiduciary's discretion. If the position describes the proposed plan of investment and contains sufficient information to inform the beneficiaries of the reasons for the proposal, the facts upon which the fiduciary relies, and an explanation of how the income and remainder beneficiaries will be affected by the proposed plan of investment, a beneficiary who challenges the proposed plan of investment has the burden of establishing that it will result in an abuse of discretion.

Acts 1951, ch. 125, §§ 1-6 (Williams, §§ 9596.12-9596.17); Acts 1968, ch. 518, § 1; 1971, ch. 61, § 1; 1974, ch. 634, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 35-319 — 35-324; Acts 1989, ch. 288, § 2; 1991, ch. 386, § 1; 2001, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2; 2002, ch. 696, § 15.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 1018.

Law Reviews.

Selection and Removal of Fiduciaries (Robert L. McMurray), 26 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

Where There's a Will: “Total return trusts” come to Tennessee (Dan W. Holbrook), 37 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 33 (2001).

35-3-118. Stocks or bonds held by fiduciary in nominee's name.

Trustees, guardians and other fiduciaries owning stocks or registered bonds may hold them in the name of a nominee without mention of the fiduciary relationship in the stock certificates, stock registration books, or registered bond or bond registry; provided, that:

The records and all reports and accounts rendered by the fiduciary clearly show the ownership of the stock or bond by the fiduciary, and the facts regarding its holding; and

The nominee deposits with the fiduciary a signed statement showing the fiduciary ownership, either endorses the stock certificate or registered bond in blank, or signs a transfer power in blank, and attach it to the certificate or bond, and does not have possession of or access to the stock certificate or bond, except under the immediate supervision of the fiduciary.

The fiduciary shall be personally liable for any loss resulting from any act of the nominee in connection with the securities so held.

This section shall apply to all such fiduciary relationships.

Acts 1953, ch. 165, §§ 1, 3 (Williams, § 9596.8b); 1957, ch. 49, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 35-325.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (5th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 1018.

Law Reviews.

Wills, Estates and Trusts (William J. Bowe), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1126 (1953).

35-3-119. Tennessee valley authority obligations.

Notwithstanding any restrictions on investments contained in any laws of this state, the state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies, insurance associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by the Tennessee valley authority pursuant to the Tennessee Valley Authority Act of 1933 (16 U.S.C. § 831), and any amendment to that act, and the bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits, it being the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions, bodies and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them, including, but not limited to, sinking, insurance, investment, retirement, compensation, pension and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as relieving any person, firm or corporation from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Acts 1961, ch. 128, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-326.

Law Reviews.

The Right to Counsel for the Indigent Defendant in Tennessee (Charles H. Miller), 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 300 (1964).

35-3-120. Federally guaranteed loans and investments.

Banks, trust companies, insurance companies, building and loan associations, credit unions, trustees and others acting in a fiduciary capacity, trust funds, pension and profit-sharing funds, real estate investment trusts, and other financial institutions, originating mortgagee institutions, and other institutions approved as mortgagees and otherwise meeting the requirements of the federal housing administration or veterans administration to act as mortgagees under the programs of these agencies may:

Make loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit that are eligible for credit insurance by the federal housing commissioner, and may obtain that insurance;

Make loans secured by real property or leasehold, that the federal housing commissioner insures or makes a commitment to insure, and may obtain that insurance;

Invest their funds, eligible for investment, in notes or bonds secured by mortgage or trust deed insured by the federal housing commissioner, and in debentures issued by the federal housing commissioner, and also in securities issued by the Federal National Mortgage Association; and

Make any loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit that are eligible to be guaranteed or insured in whole or in part by the veterans administration or administrator of veterans affairs, or secured by real property or leasehold as the administrator of veterans affairs makes a commitment to guarantee or insure.

No law of this state, requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing the nature, amount or form of the security, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or investments, or limiting investments of capital or deposits, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, shall apply to loans or investments made pursuant to this section.

Acts 1961, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 35-327, 35-328.

35-3-121. Investments in securities by banks or trust companies.

Unless the governing instrument, court order, or a statute specifically directs otherwise, a bank or trust company serving as trustee, guardian, agent, or in any other fiduciary capacity may invest in any security authorized by this chapter even if that fiduciary or an affiliate of that fiduciary, as defined in former § 35-3-117(d) [repealed], participates or has participated as a member of a syndicate underwriting the security, if:

The fiduciary does not purchase the security from itself or its affiliate; and

The fiduciary does not purchase the security from another syndicate member or an affiliate, pursuant to an implied or express agreement between the fiduciary or its affiliate and a selling member or its affiliate, to purchase all or part of each other's underwriting commitments.

Acts 1983, ch. 60, § 1; T.C.A., § 35-329.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 35-3-117(d), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2002, ch. 696, § 15, effective July 1, 2002.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

35-3-122. Liability of fiduciaries for losses.

Whenever an instrument under which a fiduciary is acting reserves to the settlor or vests an advisory or investment committee or in any other person or persons including one (1) or more other fiduciaries, to the exclusion of the fiduciary or to the exclusion of one (1) or more of several fiduciaries, authority to direct the making or retention of any investment, or to perform any other act in the management or administration of the fiduciary account, the excluded fiduciary or fiduciaries shall not be liable, either individually or as a fiduciary, for any loss resulting from the making or retention of any investment or other act pursuant to that direction.

Acts 1987, ch. 89, § 2.

35-3-123. Trustee liability — Action upon written directions.

A trustee of a revocable, irrevocable or testamentary trust is not liable to any beneficiary for any act performed or omitted pursuant to written directions from the person holding the power to revoke, terminate or amend the trust.

A trustee of a revocable, irrevocable or testamentary trust is not liable for any investment action performed or omitted pursuant to written directions from the person to whom the power to direct the investment or management of the account is delegated by the trustor.

Acts 1989, ch. 288, § 3.

35-3-124. Investment in tuition units.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, trustees and others acting in a fiduciary capacity, including governmental agencies such as court clerks, may invest funds held in trust for a minor through the purchase of tuition units on behalf of the minor under the Tennessee College Savings Trust Act, compiled in title 49, chapter 7, part 8.

Acts 1997, ch. 64, § 1; 2017, ch. 400, § 2.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee College Savings Trust Act” for “Tennessee Baccalaureate Education System Trust Act” .

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 400, § 20. July 1, 2017.